Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
146

SLAUGHTERING
OPERATIONS AND

SLAUGHTERHOUSES

Part I. Generally--Repealed

Section

146-1 to 14 Repealed

Part II. Hides and Beef

146-21 Retention of the hide of butchered calf,
heifer, cow,

steer, and bull; subject to public
inspection

146-22 Reports

146-23 Duty of vendor of butchered beef to
disclose identity

of person from whom obtained

146-24 Violations; penalty

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next